Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1204.01
Personal watercraft, defined.

Personal watercraft shall mean a class of motorboat less than sixteen feet in length which uses an internal combustion engine powering a jet pump as its primary source of motive propulsion and is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling on the watercraft rather than in the conventional manner of boat operation.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 101.